North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 6. Medical Assistance Program.
§ 108A-54.1.

Recodified as

G.S. 108A-66.1

by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12H.10(f), effective July 1, 2013.

§ 108A-54.1A.
Amendments to Medicaid State Plan and Medicaid Waivers.

The Department of Health and Human Services is expressly authorized and required to take any and all necessary action to amend the State Plan and waivers in order to keep the program within the certified budget, except as provided in G.S. 108A-54(f). For purposes of this section, the term “amendments to the State Plan” includes State Plan amendments, Waivers, and Waiver amendments.

, (c)Repealed by Session Laws 2015-245, s. 18, effective September 23, 2015.

(d)

No fewer than 10 days prior to submitting an amendment to the State Plan to the federal government, the Department shall post the amendment on its Web site and notify the members of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice and the Fiscal Research Division that the amendment has been posted. For any amendments to the State Plan that add or eliminate an optional service, the notice required by this subsection shall be 90 days. This notice requirement shall not apply to draft or proposed amendments submitted to the federal government for comments but not submitted for approval.

(e)

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-245, s. 18, effective September 23, 2015.

(f)

Any public notice required under 42 C.F.R. 447.205 shall, in addition to any other posting requirements under federal law, be posted on the Department’s Web site. Upon posting such a public notice, the Department shall notify the members of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice and the Fiscal Research Division that the public notice has been posted. Public notices shall remain posted on the Department’s Web site.

History.

2013-360, s. 12H.2(a); 2014-100, s. 12H.21(a); 2015-245, s. 18.

Primary Care Case Management for Dual Eligibles.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 12H.20(a), provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall draft one or more waivers that would expand primary care case management and that are designed to accomplish the following:

“(1) Medicare and Medicaid dual eligibles shall be required to enroll in primary care case management to the maximum extent allowed by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS).

“(2) Primary care case management shall be provided for enrolled dual eligibles.

“(3) Primary care case management for dual eligibles with a primary diagnosis of mental illness or intellectual or developmental disability may be administered by the LME/MCOs.

“The Department may submit drafts of the waivers to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) to solicit feedback but shall not submit the waivers for CMS approval until authorized by the General Assembly.”

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 12H.20(b), provides: “No later than March 1, 2015, the Department shall submit to the House Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services a copy of the draft waivers and a report, which shall include the following:

“(1) The anticipated increase in number of dual eligibles that will enroll in primary care case management.

“(2) The costs associated with serving the increased number of enrolled dual eligibles.

“(3) The anticipated savings to the Medicaid program.”

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 12H.8(a)-(c), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall adopt an average acquisition cost methodology for brand and generic drug ingredient pricing to be effective beginning on January 1, 2015. The drug ingredient pricing methodology shall be consistent with new federal requirements or, if the new federal requirements have not yet been finalized by October 1, 2014, consistent with the draft federal requirements. In adopting a new drug ingredient pricing methodology, the Department shall also do all of the following:

“(1) Raise dispensing fees so that the average acquisition cost ingredient pricing plus the dispensing fees, net of any drug rebates, generates nine hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($975,000) in savings in General Fund appropriations.

“(2) Maintain a distinction between the dispensing fees for preferred and brand drugs.

“(3) Ensure that ingredient prices are updated at least monthly.

“(b) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall issue a request for proposals (RFP) for a contractor to perform a statewide drug dispensing fee study to begin on March 1, 2015. The Department shall use the one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) appropriated in this budget for this study as the State share to draw down additional federal Medicaid funds for this study.

“(c) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall follow the procedures in

G.S. 108A-54.1

A in submitting the State plan amendment required to implement this section.”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 12H.19(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, (Department) shall adopt an average acquisition cost methodology for brand and generic drug ingredient pricing to be effective beginning on January 1, 2016. The drug ingredient pricing methodology shall be consistent with new federal requirements or, if the new federal requirements have not yet been finalized by July 1, 2015, consistent with the most recent draft federal requirements. In adopting a new drug ingredient pricing methodology, the Department shall also do all of the following:

“(1)
Raise the average dispensing fee to a weighted average amount that does not exceed twelve dollars and forty cents ($12.40).

“(2) Set actual dispensing fees that maintain a higher dispensing fee for preferred and generic drugs and a lower dispensing fee for brand and nonpreferred drugs.

“(3) Ensure that ingredient prices are updated at least monthly.

“(b) In order to implement this section, the Department shall either amend the State plan amendment request submitted to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) pursuant to Section 12H.8 of S.L. 2014-100 so that it conforms with the requirements of this section or shall withdraw that State plan amendment and submit a new State plan amendment request to CMS that conforms with the requirements of this section. Any State plan amendments required to implement this section shall not be subject to the 90-day prior submission requirement of

G.S. 108A-54.1

A(e) [repealed] but shall be submitted by January 1, 2016.”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 12H.23(a)-(d), as amended by Session Laws 2015-264, s. 88, provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall submit a State Plan amendment to modify Section 4.19-A of the Medicaid State Plan, such that, effective January 1, 2016, no Medicaid provider may receive reimbursement for Graduate Medical Education (GME) in addition to their DRG Unit Value (Base) rate under the methodology as defined in the current Medicaid State Plan.

“(b) The modification to the Medicaid State Plan required by subsection (a) of this section shall be implemented upon approval by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS).

“(c) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall be exempt from the 90-day prior submission requirement in

G.S. 108A-54.1

A(e) [repealed] in order to submit to CMS the State Plan amendment required to implement this section but shall submit the State Plan amendment by January 1, 2016.

“(d) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division by March 1, 2016, identifying options for alternative funding streams to replace the GME reimbursement eliminated by this section.”

Session Laws 2020-88, s. 9, repealed Session Laws 2015-241, s. 12H.23(a)-(d), as amended by Session Laws 2015-264, s. 88, effective July 2, 2020.

§ 108A-54.1B.
Adoption of rules; State Plans, including amendments and waivers to State Plans, have effect of rules.

The Department is expressly authorized to adopt temporary and permanent rules to implement or define the federal laws and regulations, the North Carolina State Plan of Medical Assistance, and the North Carolina State Plan of the Health Insurance Program for Children, the terms and conditions of eligibility for applicants and recipients of the Medical Assistance Program and the Health Insurance Program for Children, audits and program integrity, the services, goods, supplies, or merchandise made available to recipients of the Medical Assistance Program and the Health Insurance Program for Children, and reimbursement for the services, goods, supplies, or merchandise made available to recipients of the Medical Assistance Program and the Health Insurance Program for Children.

Rule-making authority granted under this section for particular circumstances or programs is in addition to any other rule-making authority granted to the Department under Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

Prior to filing a temporary rule authorized under G.S. 150B-21.1(a)(17) with the Rules Review Commission and the Office of Administrative Hearings, the Department shall consult with the Office of State Budget and Management on the possible fiscal impact of the temporary rule and its effect on State appropriations and local governments.

State Plans, State Plan Amendments, and Waivers approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) for the North Carolina Medicaid Program and the NC Health Choice program shall have the force and effect of rules adopted pursuant to Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.

2013-360, s. 12H.9(a), (b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12H.9(a), effective July 1, 2013, recodified former G.S. 108A-54(b) as subsection (a).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12H.9(b), effective July 1, 2013, added the section heading and subsections (b), (c), and (d).

§ 108A-54.2.
Procedures for changing medical policy.

The Department shall adopt rules to develop, amend, and adopt medical coverage policy for Medicaid and NC Health Choice in accordance with this section.

Medical coverage policy is defined as those policies, definitions, or guidelines utilized to evaluate, treat, or support the health or developmental conditions of a recipient so as to determine eligibility, authorization or continued authorization, medical necessity, course of treatment and supports, clinical outcomes, and clinical supports treatment practices for a covered procedure, product, or service. Medical coverage policy is subject to the following:

During the development of new medical coverage policy or amendment to existing medical coverage policy, the Department shall consult with and seek the advice of the Physician Advisory Group and other organizations the Secretary deems appropriate. The Secretary shall also consult with and seek the advice of officials of the professional societies or associations representing providers who are affected by the new medical coverage policy or amendments to existing medical coverage policy.

At least 45 days prior to the adoption of new or amended medical coverage policy, the Department shall:

Publish the proposed new or amended medical coverage policy on the Department’s Web site;

Notify all Medicaid and NC Health Choice providers of the proposed, new, or amended policy; and

Upon request, provide persons copies of the proposed medical coverage policy.

During the 45-day period immediately following publication of the proposed new or amended medical coverage policy, the Department shall accept oral and written comments on the proposed new or amended policy.

If, following the comment period, the proposed new or amended medical coverage policy is modified, then the Department shall, at least 15 days prior to its adoption:

Notify all Medicaid and NC Health Choice providers of the proposed policy;

Upon request, provide persons notice of amendments to the proposed policy; and

Accept additional oral or written comments during this 15-day period.

If the adoption of new or amended medical coverage policies is necessitated by an act of the General Assembly or a change in federal law, then the 45- and 15-day time periods specified in subsection (b) of this section shall instead be 30- and 10-day time periods.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-245, s. 19, effective September 23, 2015.

History.

2006-66, s. 10.4; 2009-451, s. 10.68A(b); 2011-399, s. 4; 2013-360, s. 12H.6(a); 2015-245, s. 19.

Cross References.

As to Medicaid and Health Choice provider requirements, see Chapter 108C,

G.S. 108C-1

et seq.

NC Health Choice Medical Policy.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 10.27, provides: “Unless required for compliance with federal law, the Department shall not change medical policy affecting the amount, sufficiency, duration, and scope of NC Health Choice health care services and who may provide services until the Division of Medical Assistance has prepared a five-year fiscal analysis documenting the increased cost of the proposed change in medical policy and submitted it for departmental review. If the fiscal impact indicated by the fiscal analysis for any proposed medical policy change exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000) in total requirements for a given fiscal year, then the Department shall submit the proposed medical policy change with the fiscal analysis to the Office of State Budget and Management and the Fiscal Research Division. The Department shall not implement any proposed medical policy change exceeding one million dollars ($1,000,000) in total requirements for a given fiscal year unless the source of State funding is identified and approved by the Office of State Budget and Management. For medical policy changes exceeding one million dollars ($1,000,000) in total requirements for a given fiscal year that are required for compliance with federal law, the Department shall submit the proposed medical policy or policy interpretation change with a five-year fiscal analysis to the Office of State Budget and Management prior to implementing the change. The Department shall provide the Office of State Budget and Management and the Fiscal Research Division a quarterly report itemizing all medical policy changes with total requirements of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws 2009-451, s. 10.33.

§ 108A-54.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12H.6(b), effective July 26, 2013.

History.

2009-451, s. 10.32; 2011-145, s. 10.41(a); repealed by 2013-360, s. 12H.6(b), effective July 26, 2013.

Cross References.

As to Medicaid and Health Choice provider requirements, see Chapter 108C,

G.S. 108C-1

et seq.

§ 108A-54.3A.
Eligibility categories and income thresholds.

The Department shall provide Medicaid coverage for individuals in accordance with federal statutes and regulations and specifically shall provide coverage for the following populations:

Families, children under the age of 21, pregnant women, and individuals who are aged, blind, or disabled, who are medically needy, subject to the following annual income levels after meeting the applicable deductible:

Click to view

Families and children under the age of 21, subject to the following annual income levels:

Click to view

(2a)

(For contingent effective date, see editor’s note)

A parent who has qualified under subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section shall retain eligibility for Medicaid under this section so long as all of the following criteria are met:

The parent has lost legal custody of a child pursuant to Subchapter I of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.

A child of the parent is temporarily in the legal custody of State-sponsored foster care or temporarily receiving foster care assistance under Title IV-E of the Social Security Act.

The parent is making reasonable efforts to comply with a court-ordered plan of reunification, as determined by the Department.

The parent continues to meet the family income requirements under subdivision (1) or (2) of this section.

Children under the age of 6 with family incomes equal to or less than two hundred ten percent (210%) of the federal poverty guidelines.

Children aged 6 through 18 with family incomes equal to or less than one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty guidelines.

Children under the age of 21 who are receiving foster care or adoption assistance under Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, without regard to income.

Children in the legal custody of State-sponsored foster care who are under the age of 21 and ineligible for Title IV-E assistance, without regard to income.

Independent foster care adolescents ages 18, 19, and 20, as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(w)(1), without regard to income.

Former foster care children under the age of 26 in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(IX), without regard to income.

Adoptive children with special or rehabilitative needs, regardless of the adoptive family’s income.

(Effective until March 31, 2027.) Pregnant women with incomes equal to or less than one hundred ninety-six percent (196%) of the federal poverty guidelines. Pregnant women shall remain eligible for coverage for 12 months postpartum.

(10)

(Effective March 31, 2027.)

Pregnant women with incomes equal to or less than one hundred ninety-six percent (196%) of the federal poverty guidelines. Coverage for pregnant women eligible under this subdivision include only services related to pregnancy and to other conditions determined by the Department as conditions that may complicate pregnancy.

Men and women of childbearing age with family incomes equal to or less than one hundred ninety-five percent (195%) of the federal poverty guidelines. Coverage for the individuals described in this subdivision shall be limited to coverage for family planning services.

Women who need treatment for breast or cervical cancer and who are defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XVIII).

Aged, blind, or disabled individuals, as defined in Subpart F of Part 435 of Subchapter C of Chapter IV of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, with incomes equal to or less than one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty guidelines.

Beneficiaries receiving supplemental security income under Title XVI of the Social Security Act.

Workers with disabilities, as provided in

G.S. 108A-66.1

.

Qualified working disabled individuals, as provided in

G.S. 108A-67

.

Qualified Medicare beneficiaries with incomes equal to or less than one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty guidelines. Coverage for the individuals described in this subdivision shall be limited to payment of Medicare premiums and deductibles and coinsurance for Medicare-covered services.

Specified low-income Medicare beneficiaries with incomes equal to or less than one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the federal poverty guidelines. Coverage for the individuals described in this subdivision shall be limited to payment of Medicare Part B premiums.

Qualifying individuals who are Medicare beneficiaries and who have incomes equal to or less than one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the federal poverty guidelines may be covered within funds available for the Limited Medicare-Aid Capped Enrollment program. Coverage for the individuals described in this subdivision shall be limited to payment of Medicare Part B premiums.

Recipients of an optional State supplementation program provided in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 1382e.

Individuals who meet eligibility criteria under a Medicaid waiver approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and authorized by an act of the General Assembly, within funds available for the waiver.

Refugees, in accordance with 8 U.S.C. § 1522.

Qualified aliens subject to the five-year bar for means tested public assistance under 8 U.S.C. § 1613 and undocumented aliens, only for emergency services under 8 U.S.C. § 1611.

Family Size Income Level 1 $2,904 2 3,804 3 4,404 4 4,800 5 5,196 6 5,604 7 6,000 8 6,300 9 6,504 10 6,900 11 7,200 12 7,596 13 8,004 14 8,400 each additional family member add $396

Family Size Income Level 1 $5,208 2 6,828 3 8,004 4 8,928 5 9,888 6 10,812 7 11,700 8 12,432 9 13,152 10 14,028 each additional family member add $936

History.

2020-78, s. 4D.1; 2021-62, s. 4.3; 2021-180, ss. 9D.13(a), 9D.14(b).

Subdivision (10) Set Out Twice.

The first version of subdivision (10) set out above is effective until March 31, 2027. The second version of subdivision (10) set out above is effective March 31, 2027.

Contingent Effective Date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
9D.14(c) made the addition of subdivision (2a) by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.14(b) contingent upon certain requirements being met.
For details on those contingencies, see the editor's note.

§ 108A-54.4.
Income disregard for federal cost-of-living adjustments.

An increase in a Medical Assistance Program recipient’s income due solely to a cost-of-living adjustment to federal Social Security and Railroad Retirement payments shall be disregarded when determining income eligibility for the Medical Assistance Program. This section shall not be deemed to render a recipient eligible for the Medical Assistance Program if all other eligibility requirements are not met.

History.

2012-142, s. 10.6(a); 2016-94, s. 12H.7.

§ 108A-54.5.
Maintenance of waivers for dependents of members of Armed Forces.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall ensure that the eligibility criteria for Medicaid home- and community-based waivers allow the dependent of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States to maintain the dependent’s waiver status upon the transfer of the service member to an assignment outside of North Carolina, so long as the service member maintains the State of North Carolina as the legal residence to which the service member intends to return following completion of military service and the dependent meets Medicaid eligibility criteria and all other waiver eligibility criteria upon returning to North Carolina. Consequently, a dependent who is on the waiting list for a waiver slot shall maintain the dependent’s position on the waiting list. A dependent who was receiving waiver services prior to the service member’s transfer, upon the dependent’s return to North Carolina, shall be reinstated to the dependent’s waiver slot, if the slot remains available, or shall receive a priority position on the waiting list for the next available waiver slot. This section shall not be construed to authorize the provision of waiver services outside of North Carolina.

History.

2016-71, s. 1.

§ 108A-55.
Payments.

The Department may authorize, within appropriations made for this purpose, payments of all or part of the cost of medical and other remedial care for any eligible person when it is essential to the health and welfare of such person that such care be provided, and when the total resources of such person are not sufficient to provide the necessary care. When determining whether a person has sufficient resources to provide necessary medical care, there shall be excluded from consideration the person’s primary place of residence and the land on which it is situated, and in addition there shall be excluded real property contiguous with the person’s primary place of residence in which the property tax value is less than twelve thousand dollars ($12,000).

Payments shall be made only to intermediate care facilities, hospitals and nursing homes licensed and approved under the laws of the State of North Carolina or under the laws of another state, or to pharmacies, physicians, dentists, optometrists or other providers of health-related services authorized by the Department. Payments may also be made to such fiscal intermediaries and to the capitation or prepaid health service contractors as may be authorized by the Department. Arrangements under which payments are made to capitation or prepaid health services contracts are not subject to the provisions of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes or of Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. However, the Department shall: (i) submit all proposed contracts for supplies, materials, printing, equipment, and contractual services that exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) authorized by this subsection to the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee for review as provided in

G.S. 114-8.3

; and (ii) include in all agreements or contracts to be awarded by the Department under this subsection a standard clause which provides that the State Auditor and internal auditors of the Department may audit the records of the contractor during and after the term of the contract to verify accounts and data affecting fees and performance. The Department shall not award a cost plus percentage of cost agreement or contract for any purpose.

The Department shall reimburse providers of services, equipment, or supplies under the Medical Assistance Program in the following amounts:

The amount approved by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS) of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, if CMS approves an exact reimbursement amount.

The amount determined by application of a method approved by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS) of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, if CMS approves the method by which a reimbursement amount is determined, and not the exact amount.The Department shall establish the methods by which reimbursement amounts are determined in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. A change in a reimbursement amount becomes effective as of the date for which the change is approved by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS) of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

No payments shall be made for the care of any person in a nursing home or intermediate care home which is owned or operated in whole or in part by a member of the Social Services Commission, of any county board of social services, or of any board of county commissioners, or by an official or employee of the Department or of any county department of social services or by a spouse of any such person.

Medicaid is a secondary payor of claims. The Department shall apply Medicaid medical policy to recipients who have primary insurance other than Medicare, Medicare Advantage, and Medicaid. For recipients who have primary insurance other than Medicare, Medicare Advantage, or Medicaid, the Department shall pay the lesser of the Medicaid Allowable Amount or an amount up to the actual coinsurance or deductible or both of the primary payor, in accordance with the State Plan, as approved by the Department of Health and Human Services. The Department may disregard application of this policy in cases where application of the policy would adversely affect patient care.

For payments made in fiscal year 2013-2014 and for subsequent fiscal years, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, shall publish on its Web site comprehensive information on Medicaid payments made to providers. The information shall be updated annually within three months of the close of a State fiscal year to include payments for that fiscal year. The information published shall include all of the following for each individual providing Medicaid services:

Name of the individual providing the service.

Location of service provider’s principal place of business.

Location of provided services, listed with both municipality and county. If an individual provides services in multiple locations, then those shall be specified and the items in subdivisions (6) through (10) of this subsection shall be provided for each location.

Practice name, hospital name, or other business name with which the individual providing service is affiliated.

Type of service provider and practice area.

Number of Medicaid patients seen.

Number of visits with Medicaid patients.

Number of procedures performed or items furnished for Medicaid patients.

Amount of Medicaid service payments received.

Amount of Medicaid supplemental payments received.

Amount of Medicaid settlement payments received.

Amount of Medicaid recoupments.

The information shall be published in a character-separated values (CSV) plain text format or other file format that may easily be imported into software used for spreadsheets, databases, and data analytics. The Department shall ensure that no protected patient information be published.

History.

1965, c. 1173, s. 1; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1971, c. 435; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 644; 1975, c. 123, ss. 1, 2; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, c. 25; 1979, c. 702, s. 7; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; c. 849, s. 2; 1991, c. 388, s. 1; 1993, c. 529, s. 7.3; 1998-212, s. 12.12B(c); 2010-194, s. 15; 2011-291, s. 2.22; 2011-326, s. 15(o); 2013-360, s. 12H.4; 2014-100, ss. 12H.15(a), 12H.21(b); 2019-81, s. 15(a).

§ 108A-55.1.
Medicare enrollment required.

The Department shall require State Medical Assistance Program recipients who qualify for Medicare to enroll in Medicare, in accordance with Title XIX of the Social Security Act, in order to pay medical expenditures that qualify for payment under Medicare Parts B and D, except that enrollment in Part D is not required if the recipient has creditable prescription drug coverage as defined by federal law.

Failure to enroll in Medicare shall result in nonpayment of these expenditures under the State Medical Assistance Program. A provider may seek payment for services from Medicaid enrollees who are eligible for but not enrolled in Medicare Parts B and D.

History.

2003-284, s. 10.27; 2006-66, s. 10.6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-66, s. 10.6, effective July 1, 2006, substituted “Parts B and D, except that enrollment in Part D is not required if the recipient has creditable prescription drug coverage as defined by federal law” for “Part B” at the end of the first paragraph; and substituted “Parts B and D” for “Part B” at the end of the last sentence in the second paragraph.

§ 108A-55.2.
Collaboration among agencies to ensure Medicaid-related services payments to eligible students with disabilities in public schools.

The Department shall work with the Department of Public Instruction and local education agencies to develop efficient, effective, and appropriate administrative procedures and guidelines to provide maximum funding for Medicaid-related services for Medicaid-eligible students with disabilities. The procedures and guidelines shall be streamlined to ensure that local education agencies receive Medicaid reimbursement in a timely manner for Medicaid-related services and administrative outreach to Medicaid-eligible students with disabilities.

History.

2003-284, s. 10.29A.

§ 108A-55.3.
Verification of State residency required for medical assistance.

At the time of application for medical assistance benefits, the applicant shall provide satisfactory proof that the applicant is a resident of North Carolina and that the applicant is not maintaining a temporary residence or abode incident to receiving medical assistance under this Part.

An applicant may meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section by providing at least two of the following documents:

A valid North Carolina drivers license or other identification card issued by the North Carolina Division of Motor Vehicles.

A current North Carolina rent or mortgage payment receipt, or current utility bill in the name of the applicant or the applicant’s legal spouse showing a North Carolina address.

A valid North Carolina motor vehicle registration in the applicant’s name and showing the applicant’s current address.

A document showing that the applicant is employed in this State.

One or more documents proving that the applicant’s domicile in the applicant’s prior state of domicile has ended, such as closing of a bank account, termination of employment, or sale of a home.

The tax records of the applicant or the applicant’s legal spouse, showing a current North Carolina address.

A document showing that the applicant has registered with a public or private employment service in this State.

A document showing that the applicant has enrolled the applicant’s children in a public or private school or child care facility located in this State.

A document showing that the applicant is receiving public assistance or other services requiring proof of domicile, other than medical assistance, in this State.

Records from a health department or other health care provider located in this State showing the applicant’s current North Carolina address.

A written declaration made under penalty of perjury from a person who has a social, family, or economic relationship with the applicant and who has personal knowledge of the applicant’s intent to live in North Carolina permanently or for an indefinite period of time or that the applicant is residing in North Carolina to seek employment or with a job commitment.

Current North Carolina voter registration card.

A document from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, U.S. Department of Defense, or the U.S. Department of Homeland Security verifying the applicant’s intent to live in North Carolina permanently or for an indefinite period of time or that the applicant is residing in North Carolina to seek employment or with a job commitment.

Official North Carolina school records, signed by school officials, or diplomas issued by North Carolina schools, including secondary schools, community colleges, colleges, and universities verifying the applicant’s intent to live in North Carolina permanently or for an indefinite period of time or that the applicant is residing in North Carolina to seek employment or with a job commitment.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-294, s. 14, effective October 1, 2015, and applicable to contracts entered into on or after that date.

For applicants, including those who are homeless or migrant laborers, who declare under penalty of perjury that they do not have two of the verifying documents in subsection (b) of this section, any other evidence that verifies residence may be considered. However, except for applicants of emergency Medicaid, a declaration, affidavit, or other statement from the applicant or another person that the applicant meets the requirements of G.S. 108A-24(6) is insufficient in the absence of other credible evidence. For applicants of emergency Medicaid, a declaration, affidavit, or other statement from the applicant’s employer, clergy, or other person with personal knowledge of the applicant’s intent to live in North Carolina permanently or for an indefinite period of time or that the applicant is residing in North Carolina to seek employment or with a job commitment satisfies the requirements of this subsection.

The Division of Health Benefits shall not provide payment for medical assistance provided to an applicant unless or until the applicant has met the proof of residency requirements of this section.

Unless otherwise provided for under Title 19 of the Social Security Act, a child under age 18 is a resident of the state where the child’s parent or legal guardian is domiciled.

This section does not apply to an applicant whose eligibility for medical assistance is excepted from State residency requirements under federal law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to establish North Carolina residency for a nonqualified alien who is present in North Carolina for a temporary or unspecified period of time unless the applicant is legally admitted for employment purposes.

History.

2005-276, s. 10.21A(a); 2011-183, s. 74; 2015-294, s. 14; 2019-81, s. 15(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-183, s. 74, effective June 20, 2011, substituted “U.S. Department of Defense” for “U.S. Military” in subdivision (b)(13).

Session Laws 2015-294, s. 14, effective October 1, 2015, deleted former subdivision (b)(15), which read: “A document issued by the Mexican consular or other foreign consulate verifying the applicant’s intent to live in North Carolina permanently or for an indefinite period of time or that the applicant is residing in North Carolina to seek employment or with a job commitment.” For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 15(a), effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Division of Health Benefits” for “Division of Medical Assistance” in subsection (d).